Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-103.6, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 384, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 11-103.6), is amended to read as follows:
Section 11-103.6. A. 1. The State Board of Education shall
adopt subject matter standards for instruction of students in the
public schools of this state that are necessary to ensure there is
attainment of desired levels of competencies in a variety of areas
to include language, mathematics, science, social studies,
communication, and health and physical education.
2. School districts shall develop and implement curriculum,
courses and instruction in order to ensure that students meet the
skills and competencies as set forth in this section and in the
subject matter standards adopted by the State Board of Education.
3. All students shall gain literacy at the elementary and
secondary levels. Students shall develop skills in reading,
writing, speaking, computing, and critical thinking. For purposes
of this section, critical thinking means a manner of analytical
thinking which is logical and uses linear factual analysis to reach
a conclusion. They shall learn about cultures and environments -
their own and those of others with whom they share the earth. All
students shall receive the instruction needed to lead healthy and
physically active lifestyles. Students, therefore, shall study
social studies, literature, languages, the arts, health,
mathematics, and science. Such curricula shall provide for the
teaching of a hands-on career exploration program in cooperation
with technology center schools.
4. The subject matter standards shall be designed to teach the
competencies for which students shall be tested as provided in
Section 1210.508 of this title and shall be designed to prepare all
students for active citizenship, employment, and/or successful
completion of postsecondary education without the need for remedial
coursework at the postsecondary level.
5. The subject matter standards shall be designed with rigor as
defined in paragraph 6 of subsection F N of this section.
6. The subject matter standards for English Language Arts shall
give Classic Literature and nonfiction literature equal
consideration to other literature. In addition, emphasis shall be
given to the study of complete works of literature.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 2

7. At a minimum, the subject matter standards for mathematics
shall require mastery of the standard algorithms in mathematics,
which is the most logical, efficient way of solving a problem that
consistently works, and for students to attain fluency in Euclidian
geometry.
8. The subject matter standards for history, social studies,
and United States Government shall include the content of the United
States naturalization test, with an emphasis on the specific content
of the test and the ideas and concepts it references. The United
States naturalization test shall be made available in physical and
electronic online formats as an optional assessment tool for
teachers.
9. The subject matter standards for United States Government
shall include an emphasis on civics. For the purposes of this
section, "civics" means the study of the rights and duties of
Oklahoma and United States citizens and of how those governments
work.
10. The subject matter standards for health and physical
education shall include but not be limited to the domains of
physical, emotional, social, and intellectual health. Health
literacy shall include the ability to obtain, process, and
understand basic health information and services needed to make
appropriate health decisions. Health shall also include the
importance of proper nutrition and exercise, mental health and
wellness, substance abuse, coping skills for understanding and
managing trauma, establishing and maintaining positive
relationships, and responsible decision making. Physical literacy
shall include the ability to move with competence and confidence in
a wide variety of physical activities in multiple environments that
benefit the healthy development of the whole person.
B. Subject to the provisions of subsection C or subsection D of
this section, in order to graduate from a public high school
accredited by the State Board of Education with a standard diploma,
students enrolled in grades eight through twelve in the 2024-2025
school year shall complete the following college preparatory/work
ready curriculum units or sets of competencies at the secondary
level:
1. Four (4) units or sets of competencies of English to include
Grammar, Composition, Literature, or any English course approved for
college admission requirements;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 3

2. Three (3) units or sets of competencies of mathematics,
limited to Algebra I, Algebra II, Geometry, Trigonometry, Math
Analysis, Calculus, Advanced Placement Statistics, or any
mathematics course with content and/or rigor above Algebra I and
approved for college admission requirements;
3. Three (3) units or sets of competencies of laboratory
science approved for college admission requirements including one
unit or set of competencies of life science meeting the standards
for Biology I; one unit or set of competencies of physical science
meeting the standards for Physical Science, Chemistry, or Physics;
and one unit or set of competencies from the domains of physical
science, life science, or earth and space science such that the
content and rigor is above Biology I or Physical Science;
4. Three (3) units or sets of competencies of history and
citizenship skills including one unit of American History, 1/2 unit
of Oklahoma History, 1/2 unit of United States Government, and one
unit from the subjects of History, Government, Geography, Economics,
Civics, or non-Western culture and approved for college admission
requirements;
5. Two (2) units or sets of competencies of the same world or
non-English language or two units of computer technology approved
for college admission requirements, whether taught at a high school
or a technology center school including computer programming,
hardware, and business computer applications, such as word
processing, databases, spreadsheets, and graphics, excluding
keyboarding or typing courses;
6. One (1) additional unit or set of competencies selected from
paragraphs 1 through 5 of this subsection or career and technology
education courses, concurrently enrolled courses, advanced placement
courses, or International Baccalaureate courses approved for college
admission requirements; and
7. One (1) unit or set of competencies of fine arts, such as
music, art, or drama, or one unit or set of competencies of speech.
C. In lieu of the requirements of subsection B or subsection D
of this section which requires a college preparatory/work ready
curriculum, a student enrolled in grades eight through twelve in the
2024-2025 school year may enroll in the core curriculum as provided
in this subsection upon written approval of the parent or legal
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 4

guardian of the student. For students under the age of eighteen
(18), school districts shall require a parent or legal guardian of
the student to meet with a designee of the school prior to
enrollment in the core curriculum. The State Department of
Education shall develop and distribute to school districts a form
suitable for this purpose, which shall include information on the
benefits to students of completing the college preparatory/work
ready curriculum as provided for in subsection B of this section.
In order to graduate from a public high school accredited by the
State Board of Education with a standard diploma, students enrolled
in grades eight through twelve in the 2024-2025 school year shall
complete the following core curriculum units or sets of competencies
at the secondary level:
1. Language Arts – 4 Four (4) units or sets of competencies to
consist of 1 unit or set of competencies of grammar and composition,
and 3 units or sets of competencies which may include, but are not
limited to, the following courses:
a. American Literature,
b. English Literature,
c. World Literature,
d. Advanced English Courses, or
e. other English courses with content and/or rigor equal
to or above grammar and composition;
2. Mathematics – 3 Three (3) units or sets of competencies to
consist of 1 unit or set of competencies of Algebra I or Algebra I
taught in a contextual methodology, and 2 two (2) units or sets of
competencies which may include, but are not limited to, the
following courses:
a. Algebra II,
b. Geometry or Geometry taught in a contextual
methodology,
c. Trigonometry,
d. Math Analysis or Precalculus,
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 5

e. Calculus,
f. Statistics and/or Probability,
g. Computer Science or acceptance and successful
completion of one (1) year of a full-time, three-hour
career and technology program leading to an industry
credential/certificate or college credit. The State
Board of Career and Technology Education shall
promulgate rules to define the provisions of this
section related to the accepted industry-valued
credentials which are industry-endorsed or industry-
aligned. The list of accepted industry-valued
credentials shall be reviewed annually and updated at
least every three (3) years by the Board,
h. (1) contextual mathematics courses which enhance
technology preparation, or
(2) a science, technology, engineering, and math
(STEM) block course meeting the requirements for
course competencies listed in paragraph 2 of
subsection B of this section, whether taught at
a:
(a) comprehensive high school, or
(b) technology center school when taken in the
tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade, taught by
a certified teacher, and approved by the
State Board of Education and the independent
district board of education,
i. mathematics courses taught at a technology center
school by a teacher certified in the secondary subject
area when taken in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth
grade upon approval of the State Board of Education
and the independent district board of education, or
j. any other mathematics course with content and/or rigor
equal to or above Algebra I;
3. Science – 3 Three (3) units or sets of competencies to
consist of 1 one (1) unit or set of competencies of Biology I or
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 6

Biology I taught in a contextual methodology, and 2 two (2) units or
sets of competencies in the areas of life, physical, or earth
science or technology which may include, but are not limited to, the
following courses:
a. Chemistry I,
b. Physics,
c. Biology II,
d. Chemistry II,
e. Physical Science,
f. Earth Science,
g. Botany,
h. Zoology,
i. Physiology,
j. Astronomy,
k. Applied Biology/Chemistry,
l. Applied Physics,
m. Principles of Technology,
n. qualified agricultural education courses,
o. (1) contextual science courses which enhance
technology preparation, or
(2) a science, technology, engineering, and math
(STEM) block course meeting the requirements for
course competencies listed in paragraph 3 of
subsection B of this section, whether taught at
a:
(a) comprehensive high school, or
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 7

(b) technology center school when taken in the
tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade, taught by
a certified teacher, and approved by the
State Board of Education and the independent
district board of education,
p. science courses taught at a technology center school
by a teacher certified in the secondary subject area
when taken in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade
upon approval of the State Board of Education and the
independent district board of education, or
q. other science courses with content and/or rigor equal
to or above Biology I;
4. Social Studies – 3 Three (3) units or sets of competencies
to consist of 1 unit or set of competencies of United States
History, 1/2 to 1 unit or set of competencies of United States
Government, 1/2 unit or set of competencies of Oklahoma History, and
1/2 to 1 unit or set of competencies which may include, but are not
limited to, the following courses:
a. World History,
b. Geography,
c. Economics,
d. Anthropology, or
e. other social studies courses with content and/or rigor
equal to or above United States History, United States
Government, and Oklahoma History;
5. Arts – 1 One (1) unit or set of competencies which may
include, but is not limited to, courses in Visual Arts and General
Music; and
6. Computer Education or World Language – 1 One (1) unit or set
of competencies of computer technology, whether taught at a high
school or a technology center school, including computer
programming, hardware, and business computer applications, such as
word processing, databases, spreadsheets, and graphics, excluding
keyboarding or typing courses, or 1 one (1) unit or set of
competencies of world or non-English language; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 8

7. One-half (1/2) unit or set of competencies of personal
financial literacy, as provided in the Passport to Financial
Literacy Act, whether taught as an elective course or when taught
during instruction as provided in and subject to the standards of
subsection A of Section 11-103.6h of this title in coursework
offered by the school district or partnering technology center
school by a teacher certified in a relevant secondary subject area
and taken in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade. The one-half
(1/2) unit in personal financial literacy required under this
paragraph may be fulfilled through an Advanced Placement (AP) course
whose content substantially addresses the required concepts.
D. Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, students whose
parent or legal guardian approve modification of the existing
graduation track as outlined in subsections B and C of this section,
subject to school approval, may complete a minimum of twenty-three
(23) curriculum units or sets of competencies at the secondary level
as listed below; and students entering the eighth grade in the 2025-
2026 school year, in order to graduate from a public high school
accredited by the State Board of Education with a standard diploma,
students shall complete a minimum of the following twenty-three (23)
curriculum units or sets of competencies at the secondary level:
1. Four (4) units or sets of competencies of English to include
Grammar, Composition, Literature, or any English course including an
Advanced Placement Seminar taught as an English course;
2. Four (4) units or sets of competencies of mathematics, two
of which shall be Algebra I and either Algebra II or Geometry. The
other two units shall be at or above the rigor of Algebra I and may
include Algebra II, Geometry, Trigonometry, Math Analysis, Calculus,
Statistics, Math of Finance, Computer Science, college courses
approved for dual credit, an approved full-time postsecondary career
and technology program, or locally approved math based application
course, or any mathematics course with content and/or rigor above
Algebra I;
3. Three (3) units or sets of competencies of laboratory
science approved for college admission requirements including one
unit or set of competencies of life science meeting the standards
for Biology I; one (1) unit or set of competencies of physical
science meeting the standards for Physical Science, Chemistry, or
Physics; and one (1) unit or set of competencies from the domains of
physical science, life science, or earth and space science, or
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 9

approved full-time postsecondary career and technology program or
locally approved science-based application course, or any science
course with content and/or rigor above Biology I or Physical
Science;
4. Three (3) units or sets of competencies of history and
citizenship skills including one unit of American History, 1/2 one-
half (1/2) unit of Oklahoma History, 1/2 one-half (1/2) unit of
United States Government, and one (1) unit from the subjects of
History, Government, Geography, Economics, Civics, or non-Western
culture;
5. Six (6) pathway units or sets of competencies approved at
the discretion of the school district board of education which align
with each student's Individual Career and Academic Plan (ICAP) and
may include, but are not limited to, any additional units or sets of
competencies as provided in paragraphs 1 through 4 of this
subsection, world or non-English language, computer technology,
Junior Reserve Officers' Training Corps (JROTC), internship or
apprenticeship programs, career and technology education courses,
concurrently enrolled courses, advanced placement courses,
International Baccalaureate courses approved for college admission
requirements, music, art, drama, speech, dance, media arts, or other
approved courses; and
6. Three (3) units or sets of competencies of elective courses
approved by the school district board of education; and
7. One-half (1/2) unit or set of competencies of personal
financial literacy, as provided in the Passport to Financial
Literacy Act, whether taught as an elective course or when taught
during instruction as provided in and subject to the standards of
subsection A of Section 11-103.6h of this title in coursework
offered by the school district or partnering technology center
school by a teacher certified in a relevant secondary subject area
and taken in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade. The one-half
(1/2) unit in personal financial literacy required under this
paragraph may be fulfilled through an Advanced Placement (AP) course
whose content substantially addresses the required concepts.
E. A school district shall determine the specific description
of the locally approved math and science based application courses
allowed pursuant to paragraphs 2 and 3 of subsection D of this
section. Formal notification with the specific course description
shall be provided to the State Department of Education prior to July
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 10

1 of each school year. The notification shall include what courses
will be coded as locally approved math and science based application
courses for the ensuing school year.
F. 1. In addition to the curriculum requirements of subsection
B, C, or D of this section, in order to graduate from a public high
school accredited by the State Board of Education students shall
complete the requirements for a personal financial literacy passport
as set forth in the Passport to Financial Literacy Act and any
additional course requirements or recommended elective courses as
may be established by the State Board of Education and the district
school board. School districts shall strongly encourage students to
complete two units or sets of competencies of world languages and
two units or sets of competencies of physical and health education.
2. No student shall receive credit for high school graduation
more than once for completion of the same unit or set of
competencies to satisfy the curriculum requirements of this section.
3. A school district shall not be required to offer every
course listed in subsections B, C, and D of this section but shall
offer sufficient courses to allow a student to meet the graduation
requirements during the secondary grade years of the student A
school district may issue an alternate diploma to a student who
meets the definition of a student with the most significant
cognitive disabilities and who participates in the Oklahoma
Alternate Assessment Program (OAAP) beginning in the 2023-2024
school year. An alternate diploma shall be standards-based, aligned
with requirements for a standard diploma, and obtained by the school
year in which a student turns twenty-two (22) years of age.
G. An alternate diploma shall not terminate a Free and
Appropriate Public Education (FAPE) for students with an
Individualized Education Program (IEP) unless they reach the maximum
age of FAPE. The IEP team shall determine subsequent courses and
services for students who receive an alternate diploma.
H. Students participating in the OAAP shall not be precluded
from attempting to meet the requirements of a standard diploma, and
participation in the OAAP shall be assessed by alternate achievement
standards that promote access to and progress in the general
education curriculum, and shall not determine a student's
educational setting under the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act (IDEA).
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 11

I. Students who meet the requirements for an alternate diploma
may count as having received a standard diploma for purposes of
calculating and reporting the adjusted cohort graduation rate
(ACGR).
J. A student may be awarded an alternate diploma upon
completion of the following curriculum units or sets of competencies
at the secondary level:
1. Language Arts – Four (4) units or sets of competencies based
on alternate academic achievement standards to consist of reading
literature, reading informational text, writing, speaking and
listening, and language in the following courses:
a. English 1 Alternate,
b. English 2 Alternate,
c. English 3 Alternate, and
d. English 4 Alternate;
2. Mathematics – Four (4) units or sets of competencies based
on alternate academic achievement standards to consist of quantities
or measurement, algebra, functions or statistics, probability, and
geometry in the following courses:
a. Math Alternate 1,
b. Math Alternate 2,
c. Math Alternate 3, and
d. Math Alternate 4;
3. Science – Three (3) units or sets of competencies based on
alternate academic achievement standards to consist of life science,
physical science, and earth science in the following courses:
a. Life Science Alternate,
b. Physical Science Alternate, and
c. Earth Science Alternate;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 12

4. Social Studies – Three (3) units or sets of competencies
based on alternate academic achievement standards to consist of
United States History, United States Government, Oklahoma History,
Geography, and Social Studies in the following courses:
a. Social Studies Alternate 1,
b. Social Studies Alternate 2, and
c. Social Studies Alternate 3;
5. Arts – One (1) unit or set of competencies which may
include, but is not limited to, courses in Visual Arts and General
Music;
6. Computer Education or World Language – One (1) unit or set
of competencies of computer technology, whether taught at a high
school or a technology center school, including computer
programming, hardware, and business computer applications, such as
word processing, databases, spreadsheets, and graphics, excluding
keyboarding or typing courses, or one (1) unit or set of
competencies of world or non-English language;
7. Career Readiness – At least two (2) units of Career
Readiness, including Career Readiness I, Career Readiness II, Career
Readiness III, or Career Readiness IV. Each Career Readiness course
may be substituted for Careers/Exploration, Internship I, or
Internship II; and
8. Life Skills – At least two (2) units of Life Skills, such as
Life Skills I, Life Skills II, Life Skills III, or Life Skills IV.
Each Life Skills course may be substituted for the Life Skills or
Family and Consumer Science course.
K. Courses in the core curriculum may be used as a substitute
for corresponding courses required by the alternate diploma. Other
courses may be substituted as determined by the State Board of
Education.
L. 1. In addition to the curriculum requirements of either
subsection B, C, or D of this section, in order to graduate from a
public high school accredited by the State Board of Education,
students shall complete any additional course requirements or
recommended elective courses as may be established by the State
Board of Education and the district school board. School districts
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 13

shall strongly encourage students to complete two (2) units or sets
of competencies of world languages and two (2) units or sets of
competencies of physical and health education.
2. No student shall receive credit for high school graduation
more than once for completion of the same unit or set of
competencies to satisfy the curriculum requirements of this section.
3. A school district shall not be required to offer every
course listed in subsections B, C, and D of this section but shall
offer sufficient courses to allow a student to meet the graduation
requirements during the secondary grade years of the student.
M. The State Board of Education may develop rules to determine
if courses on aviation are eligible for nonelective academic credit
toward meeting the graduation requirements set forth in subsections
B and D of this section.
G. N. For purposes of this section:
1. "Contextual methodology" means academic content and skills
taught by utilizing real-world problems and projects in a way that
helps students understand the application of that knowledge;
2. "Locally approved" means approved by the local school
district board of education;
3. "Math based application course" means a course that teaches
math content within a real-world application;
4. "Pathway unit" means a course taken by a high school student
that is aligned with the student's current Individualized Career and
Academic Plan (ICAP);
5. "Qualified agricultural education courses" means courses
that have been determined by the State Board of Education to offer
the sets of competencies for one or more science content areas and
which correspond to academic science courses. Qualified
agricultural education courses shall include, but are not limited
to, horticulture, plant and soil science, natural resources and
environmental science, and animal science. The courses shall be
taught by teachers certified in agricultural education and comply
with all rules of the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology
Education;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 14

6. "Rigor" means a level of difficulty that is thorough,
exhaustive and accurate and is appropriate for the grade level;
7. "Science-based application course" means a course that
teaches science content within a real-world application;
8. "Sets of competencies" means instruction in those skills and
competencies that are specified in the subject matter standards
adopted by the State Board of Education and other skills and
competencies adopted by the Board, without regard to specified
instructional time; and
9. "Unit" means a Carnegie Unit as defined by the North Central
Association's Commission on Schools.
H. O. 1. The State Board of Education, State Board of Career
and Technology Education, and State Regents for Higher Education
shall adopt a joint plan and electronically submit it to the Speaker
of the Oklahoma House of Representatives and the President Pro
Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate by January 1, 2025, to ensure
that rigor is maintained in the content, teaching methodology, level
of expectations for student achievement, and application of learning
in all the courses taught to meet the graduation requirements
specified in subsection D of this section.
2. The State Board of Education shall allow as much flexibility
at the district level as is possible without diminishing the rigor
or undermining the intent of providing these courses. To accomplish
this purpose, the State Department of Education shall work with
school districts in reviewing and approving courses taught by
districts that are not specifically listed in subsections B, C, and
D of this section. Options may include, but shall not be limited
to, courses taken by concurrent enrollment, advanced placement, or
correspondence, or courses bearing different titles.
3. Technology center school districts may offer programs
designed in cooperation with institutions of higher education.
Students in the tenth grade may be allowed to attend these programs
for up to one-half (1/2) of a school day and credit for the units or
sets of competencies required in paragraphs 2, 3, and 6 of
subsection B or C and paragraphs 2 and 3 of subsection D of this
section shall be given if the courses are taught by a teacher
certified in the secondary subject area; provided, credit for units
or sets of competencies pursuant to subsection B of this section
shall be approved for college admission requirements.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 15

4. If a student enrolls in a concurrent course, the school
district shall not be responsible for any costs incurred for that
course, unless the school district does not offer enough course
selection during the student's secondary grade years to allow the
student to receive the courses needed to meet the graduation
requirements of this section. If the school district does not offer
the necessary course selection during the student's secondary grade
years, it shall be responsible for the cost of resident tuition at
an institution in The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,
fees, and books for the concurrent enrollment course, and providing
for transportation to and from the institution to the school site.
It is the intent of the Legislature that for students enrolled
in a concurrent enrollment course which is paid for by the school
district pursuant to this paragraph, the institution charge only the
supplementary and special service fees that are directly related to
the concurrent enrollment course and enrollment procedures for that
student. It is further the intent of the Legislature that fees for
student activities and student service facilities including the
student health care and cultural and recreational service fees not
be charged to such students.
5. Credit for the units or sets of competencies required in
subsection B, C, or D of this section shall be given when such units
or sets of competencies are taken prior to ninth grade if the
teachers are certified or authorized to teach the subjects for high
school credit and the required rigor is maintained.
6. The units or sets of competencies in mathematics required in
subsection B, C, or D of this section may be completed at any time
during the eighth through twelfth grades. If a student completes
any required courses or sets of competencies in mathematics prior to
eighth grade, the student may take any other mathematics courses or
sets of competencies to fulfill the requirement to complete the
units or sets of competencies in grades eight through twelve after
the student has satisfied the requirements of subsection B, C, or D
of this section.
7. All units or sets of competencies required for graduation
may be taken in any sequence recommended by the school district.
I. P. As a condition of receiving accreditation from the State
Board of Education, all students in grades nine through twelve shall
enroll in a minimum of six periods, or the equivalent in block
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 16

scheduling or other scheduling structure that allows for instruction
in sets of competencies, of rigorous academic and/or rigorous
vocational courses each day, which may include arts, vocal and
instrumental music, speech classes, and physical education classes.
J. Q. 1. Academic and vocational-technical courses designed to
offer sets of competencies integrated or embedded within the course
that provide for the teaching and learning of the appropriate skills
and knowledge in the subject matter standards, as adopted by the
State Board of Education, may upon approval of the Board, in
consultation with the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology
Education if the courses are offered at a technology center school
district, be counted for academic credit and toward meeting the
graduation requirements of this section.
2. Internet-based courses offered by a technology center school
that are taught by a certified teacher and provide for the teaching
and learning of the appropriate skills and knowledge in the subject
matter standards may, upon approval of the State Board of Education
and the independent district board of education, be counted for
academic credit and toward meeting the graduation requirements of
this section.
3. Internet-based courses or vocational-technical courses
utilizing integrated or embedded skills for which no subject matter
standards have been adopted by the State Board of Education may be
approved by the Board, in consultation with the Oklahoma Department
of Career and Technology Education if the courses are offered by a
technology center school district, if such courses incorporate
standards of nationally recognized professional organizations and
are taught by certified teachers.
4. Courses offered by a supplemental education organization
that is accredited by a national accrediting body and that are
taught by a certified teacher and provide for the teaching and
learning of the appropriate skills and knowledge in the subject
matter standards may, upon approval of the State Board of Education
and the school district board of education, be counted for academic
credit and toward meeting the graduation requirements of this
section.
K. R. The State Board of Education shall provide an option for
high school graduation based upon attainment of the desired levels
of competencies as required in tests pursuant to the provisions of
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 17

Section 1210.508 of this title. Such option shall be in lieu of the
amount of course credits earned.
L. S. The State Board of Education shall prescribe, adopt and
approve a promotion system based on the attainment by students of
specified levels of competencies in each area of the core
curriculum.
M. T. Children who have individualized education programs
pursuant to the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA),
and who satisfy the graduation requirements through the
individualized education program for that student shall be awarded a
standard diploma.
N. U. Any student who completes the curriculum requirements of
the International Baccalaureate Diploma Program shall be awarded a
standard diploma.
O. V. Any student who successfully completes an advanced
mathematics or science course offered pursuant to Section 1210.404
of this title shall be granted academic credit toward meeting the
graduation requirements pursuant to paragraph 2 or 3, as
appropriate, of subsection B, C, or D of this section.
P. W. For purposes of this section, the courses approved for
college admission requirements shall be courses which are approved
by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education for admission to
an institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education.
Q. X. Students who have been denied a standard diploma by the
school district in which the student is or was enrolled for failing
to meet the requirements of this section may re-enroll in the school
district that denied the student a standard diploma following the
denial of a standard diploma. The student shall be provided
remediation or intervention and the opportunity to complete the
curriculum units or sets of competencies required by this section to
obtain a standard diploma. Students who re-enroll in the school
district to meet the graduation requirements of this section shall
be exempt from the hourly instructional requirements of Section 1-
111 of this title and the six-period enrollment requirements of this
section.
SECTION 2. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-103.6, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 264, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 11-103.6), is hereby repealed.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 18

SECTION 3. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-103.6, as
last amended by Section 166, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 11-103.6), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 19

Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1521 Page 20